New Mexico, session 2026, HB284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 71 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] OFFICE OF ENERGY INFORMATION--ADMINISTRATIVELY ATTACHED--POWERS AND DUTIES.-- A. As used in this section, "energy-sector entity" means a person engaged in: (1) ownership or control of mineral fuel resources or nonmineral energy resources; (2) exploration for or development of mineral fuel resources; (3) extraction of mineral fuel or nonmineral energy resources; (4) refining, milling or otherwise processing mineral fuels or nonmineral energy resources; (5) the storage of mineral fuels or nonmineral energy resources; (6) the generation, transmission or storage of electrical energy; (7) the transportation of mineral fuels or nonmineral energy resources; or (8) wholesale or retail distribution of mineral fuels, nonmineral energy resources or electrical energy. B. The "office of energy information" is created and is administratively attached to the energy, minerals and natural resources department. The energy, minerals and natural resources department shall provide administrative services for the office of energy information. C. On or before July 31, 2026, the director of the office of energy information shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Subject to appropriations, the director may hire staff as necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the office of energy information. D. The office of energy information shall: (1) assess existing relevant energy and emissions data collection and reporting across executive agencies; (2) consult with the Indian affairs department to create a protocol for acquiring and analyzing energy and emissions data from Indian nations, tribes and pueblos that will then be included in a data collection framework; (3) at least annually, require energy-sector entities to submit energy and emissions data in a form specified by the office of energy information, including: (a) all significant energy-related functions within the energy-sector entity, sorted by energy source and geographic area; (b) costs associated with exploration, development, production, processing, transportation and other significant energy-related functions within the energy-sector entity; (c) the quantity of fuels consumed, using standardized units of measurement identified by the office of energy information; (d) energy expenditures; (e) fuel switching capabilities; (f) uses of nonpurchased sources of energy, such as solar, wind, biomass, geothermal, waste byproducts and cogeneration; (g) volumes of imports and exports of energy in and out of New Mexico; (h) water used during energy generation; and (i) other information that the office of energy information deems relevant; (4) make energy and emissions data publicly accessible, while protecting against the release of proprietary business information, trade secrets or other confidential information; (5) analyze the data provided by executive agencies, Indian nations, tribes and pueblos and energy-sector entities to produce an annual report that includes: (a) an analysis of the competitive structure of sectors and functional groupings within the energy industry; (b) a list of the energy-related functions of energy-sector entities within New Mexico, sorted by energy source and geographic area; (c) costs associated with exploration, development, production, processing, transportation and other significant energy-related functions within the energy-sector entity; and (d) other analyses or evaluations that the office of energy information deems relevant; and (6) beginning on January 1, 2027 and on every January 1 thereafter, publish the annual report in a form that: (a) is publicly accessible and transparent; and (b) protects against the release of proprietary business information, trade secrets or other confidential information from individual facilities and operations. E. The energy, minerals and natural resources department; the department of environment; the economic development department; the department of transportation; the New Mexico department of agriculture; the homeland security and emergency management department; the public regulation commission; the Indian affairs department; the state land office; and the New Mexico renewable energy transmission authority shall provide energy and emissions data requested by the office of energy information. F. The office of energy information may: (1) promulgate rules regarding the collection of energy and emissions data, including the form and schedule for reporting that the office deems appropriate to meet the requirements pursuant to this section; and (2) conduct other studies and publish findings that the director deems relevant to inform policymakers and the public with objective energy and emissions data and analysis." SECTION 2. TEMPORARY PROVISION--ENERGY INFORMATION WORKING GROUP.-- A. On or before August 31, 2026, the secretary of energy, minerals and natural resources shall convene a working group composed of: (1) the secretary of energy, minerals and natural resources; (2) the director of the office of energy information; (3) a representative from the department of environment; (4) a representative from the economic development department; (5) a representative from the department of transportation; (6) a representative from the New Mexico department of agriculture; (7) a representative from the homeland security and emergency management department; (8) a representative from the workforce solutions department; (9) a representative from the public regulation commission; (10) a representative from the Indian affairs department; (11) a representative from the state land office; and (12) a representative from the New Mexico renewable energy transmission authority. B. On or before December 1, 2026, the energy information working group shall identify relevant energy and emissions data collected from energy-sector entities by the executive agencies participating in the working group and propose formats and permanent schedules for providing that data to the office of energy information. SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION.--Three million dollars ($3,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the office of energy information for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for staff, furniture, equipment, supplies and other costs. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 7 -